District of Columbia statutes.
46-502

Formalities.

A premarital agreement must be in writing and signed by both parties. It is enforceable without consideration.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-82, § 3, 42 DCR 6770
1981 Ed., § 30-142.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2 of the Uniform Premarital Agreement Act.